el: Σύνθεση βάσης λιπαντικού για χάλκινα πνευστά όργανα: Με βάση το πετρέλαιο/ορυκτέλαιο; Φυτικής βάσης/βιολογικής βάσης; Με βάση τη σιλικόνη; Συνθετικό; Με βάση το νερό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Composição base do lubrificante para instrumentos de sopro de metal: À base de petróleo/óleo mineral; À base de plantas/biológico; À base de silicone; Sintético; À base de água; Outros
sk-SK: Základné zloženie maziva pre dychové nástroje: Na báze ropy/minerálnych olejov; Na rastlinnej/biologickej báze; Na báze silikónu; Syntetické; Na báze vody; Iné
en: Brass instrument lubricant base composition: Petroleum/mineral oil-based; Plant-based/biobased; Silicone-based; Synthetic; Water-based; Other
es: Composición base del lubricante para instrumentos de metal: A base de petróleo/aceite mineral; A base de plantas/origen biológico; A base de silicona; Sintético; A base de agua; Otro
nb: Sammensetning av smøremiddelbase for messinginstrumenter: Petroleums-/mineraloljebasert; Plantebasert/biobasert; Silikonbasert; Syntetisk; Vannbasert; Annet
fr: Composition de base du lubrifiant pour instruments en laiton: À base de pétrole/d’huile minérale; À base de plantes/biosourcé; À base de silicone; Synthétique; À base d’eau; Autre
th: ส่วนประกอบพื้นฐานของสารหล่อลื่นสำหรับเครื่องดนตรีทองเหลือง: สูตรปิโตรเลียม/น้ำมันแร่; สูตรจากพืช/ชีวภาพ; สูตรซิลิโคน; สูตรสังเคราะห์; สูตรน้ำ; อื่นๆ
vi: Thành phần cơ bản của chất bôi trơn nhạc cụ bằng đồng thau: Gốc dầu mỏ/dầu khoáng; Gốc thực vật/sinh học; Gốc silicon; Tổng hợp; Gốc nước; Khác
ro-RO: Compoziția de bază a lubrifiantului pentru instrumente din alamă: Pe bază de petrol/ulei mineral; Pe bază de plante/biologică; Pe bază de silicon; Sintetic; Pe bază de apă; Altele
ru: Базовый состав смазки для духовых инструментов: На основе нефтепродуктов/минерального масла; На растительной/биологической основе; На силиконовой основе; Синтетическая; На водной основе; Другое
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı yağlayıcısı baz bileşimi: Petrol/mineral yağ bazlı; Bitki bazlı/biyobazlı; Silikon bazlı; Sentetik; Su bazlı; Diğer
cs: Základní složení maziva pro žesťové nástroje: Na bázi ropy / minerálních olejů; Na rostlinné/biologické bázi; Na bázi silikonu; Syntetické; Na vodní bázi; Jiné
fi: Vaskipuhaltimien voiteluaineen peruskoostumus: Maaöljy-/mineraaliöljypohjainen; Kasvipohjainen/biopohjainen; Silikonipohjainen; Synteettinen; Vesipohjainen; Muu
lt-LT: Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų tepalo bazinė sudėtis: Naftos / mineralinės alyvos pagrindu; Augalinis / biologinio pagrindo; Silikono pagrindu; Sintetinis; Vandens pagrindu; Kita
zh-TW: 黃銅樂器潤滑油基礎成分: 石油/礦物油基; 植物基/生物基; 矽膠基; 合成; 水基; 其他
ko: 금관악기용 윤활제 기본 조성: 석유/광물유 기반; 식물성/바이오 기반; 실리콘 기반; 합성; 수성; 기타
da: Grundlæggende sammensætning af smøremiddel til messingblæseinstrumenter: Petroleums-/mineraloliebaseret; Plante-/biobaseret; Silikonebaseret; Syntetisk; Vandbaseret; Andet
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer kenőanyagának alapösszetétele: Petróleum/ásványolaj alapú; Növényi/biológiai alapú; Szilikonalapú; Szintetikus; Vízalapú; Egyéb
de: Basiszusammensetzung des Klappenöls für Blechblasinstrumente: Auf Erdöl-/Mineralölbasis; Pflanzlich/Biobasiert; Auf Silikonbasis; Synthetisch; Wasserbasiert; Sonstiges
nl: Samenstelling van de basis van het smeermiddel voor koperblazers: Op basis van petroleum/minerale olie; Plantaardig/biogebaseerd; Op siliconenbasis; Synthetisch; Op waterbasis; Overig
pt-PT: Composição base do lubrificante para instrumentos de sopro de metal: À base de petróleo/óleo mineral; À base de plantas/origem biológica; À base de silicone; Sintético; À base de água; Outro
pl: Skład bazy środka smarnego do instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Na bazie ropy naftowej / oleju mineralnego; Na bazie roślinnej / biologicznej; Na bazie silikonu; Syntetyczny; Na bazie wody; Inny
bg-BG: Основен състав на смазката за месингови музикални инструменти: На базата на петрол/минерално масло; На растителна/биологична основа; На силиконова основа; Синтетичен; На водна основа; Друго
sl-SI: Osnovna sestava maziva za trobila: Na osnovi nafte / mineralnega olja; Rastlinska osnova / biološka osnova; Na osnovi silikona; Sintetično; Na vodni osnovi; Drugo
sv: Smörjmedelsbas för bleckblåsinstrument: Petroleum-/mineraloljebaserad; Växtbaserad/biobaserad; Silikonbaserad; Syntetisk; Vattenbaserad; Övrigt
it: Composizione base lubrificante per strumenti in ottone: A base di petrolio/olio minerale; A base vegetale/biologica; A base di silicone; Sintetico; A base d'acqua; Altro
zh-CN: 铜管乐器润滑剂基础成分: 石油/矿物油基; 植物基/生物基; 硅基; 合成; 水基; 其他
ja: 真鍮製楽器用潤滑剤の基油組成物: 石油/鉱物油ベース; 植物ベース/バイオベース; シリコンベース; 合成; 水性; その他
hr-HR: Sastav baze maziva za limene instrumente: Na bazi nafte / mineralnog ulja; Na biljnoj/biološkoj bazi; Na bazi silikona; Sintetičko; Na bazi vode; Ostalo